Hawaii statutes.
§10-9.5 Salary commission; established.
(a) There is established a salary commission for the members of the board of
trustees for the office of Hawaiian affairs. The salary commission shall
consist of seven members appointed by the governor on or before August 31,
1999, and every four years thereafter. The members of the salary commission
shall be selected from nominations submitted by native Hawaiian organizations
as defined in section 673-2(c). The members shall serve without compensation,
but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses while in the
discharge of their duties and responsibilities.

(b) Before the twentieth legislative day of
the regular session of 2000 and every four years thereafter, the salary
commission shall study and make recommendations for the salary of the members
of the board of trustees for the office of Hawaiian affairs, and then shall be
dissolved. The recommended salary shall be effective as of the date of the
recommendations unless the legislature disapproves the recommendation by
adoption of a concurrent resolution prior to adjournment sine die of the
legislative session in which the recommendation is submitted. [L 1993, c 358,
pt of §2; am L 1999, c 191, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next